Washington statutes.
RCW 44.48.090

Committee's powers.

The committee shall have the following powers:

(1) To have timely access, upon written request of the administrator, to all machine readable, printed, and other data of state agencies relative to expenditures, budgets, and related fiscal matters;

(2) To suggest changes relative to state accounting and reporting systems to the office of financial management or its successor and to require timely written responses to such suggestions; and

(3) Subject to RCW 44.04.260, to enter into contracts; and when entering into any contract for computer access, make necessary provisions relative to the scheduling of computer time and usage in recognition of the unique requirements and priorities of the legislative process.

[ 2001 c 259 s 14; 1979 c 151 s 158; 1977 ex.s. c 373 s 9.]